Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 45.2-1800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Offshore Wind Development Authority established pursuant to Article 2 (§

45.2-1803

et seq.).

“Division”
means the Division of Offshore Wind in the Department as established pursuant to §

45.2-1802

.

“Hampton Roads region”
means the same as that term is defined in § 22.1-356.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1801.
Offshore wind energy resources; policy.

It is the policy of the Commonwealth to support federal efforts to examine the feasibility of offshore wind energy being utilized in an environmentally responsible fashion.

History.

2006, c. 939, § 67-300; 2010, cc. 607, 756; 2020, cc. 451, 452; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1802.
Division of Offshore Wind established.

The Director shall establish the Division of Offshore Wind in the Department and shall appoint persons to direct, support, and execute the powers and duties of the Division.

The powers and duties of the Division include:

Identifying specific measures that will facilitate the establishment of the Hampton Roads region as a wind industry hub for offshore wind generation projects in state and federal waters off the United States coast;

Coordinating state agencies’ activities related to offshore wind, including development of programs that prepare the Commonwealth’s workforce to work in the offshore wind industry, create employment opportunities for Virginians within such industry, create opportunities for Commonwealth-based businesses to participate in the offshore wind industry supply chain, and attract out-of-state offshore wind-related businesses to locate within the Commonwealth;

Developing and implementing a stakeholder engagement strategy that identifies key groups, sets forth outreach objectives, and outlines a timeline for outreach and engagement;

Identifying regulatory and other barriers to the deployment of offshore wind and attraction of offshore wind supply chain businesses; and

Providing staff support for the Authority and facilitating fulfillment of the Authority’s purpose and duties set forth in Article 2 (§

45.2-1803

et seq.).

On or before October 15 of each year, the Division shall submit an annual summary of its activities, the ways in which those activities have furthered the functions and programs of the Division, and the benefits of the efforts of the Division to the Commonwealth and its economy to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor. The Division may include its submission with the report of the Authority required by §

45.2-1808

.

History.

2020, c. 794, § 45.1-161.5:1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.